Wyoming, session 2025, HB0325.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-2-205.2 is created to read:

37-2-205.2. Large-scale industrial power users;
procurement of electricity; requirements.
HB0325

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0728

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Large-scale industrial power user" means an
electric customer located in Wyoming with annual demand of
not less than one (1) megawatt hour;

(ii) "Person" includes an electric public
utility or other person performing the functions specified
in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi)(C), an electric utility operated by
a city or town, a cooperative electric utility as defined
in W.S. 37-17-101(a)(i) and a power district organized
under chapter 7 of this title.

(b) Notwithstanding the requirements of W.S.
37-2-205, 37-2-205.1 and any other provision of this act
establishing or regulating certificated service
territories, each large-scale industrial power user may
procure electric power from any person, subject to all of
the following:

(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to require the person providing electricity to a
HB0325

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0728
large-scale industrial power user under this section to
compensate the public utility that has a certificate of
convenience and necessity for the location of the
large-scale industrial power user;

(ii) Electricity purchased by a large-scale
industrial power user under this section shall:

(A) Be received and consumed by the
large-scale industrial power user on the site where the
electricity is received by the large-scale industrial power
user;

(B) Be consumed only for commercial or
industrial use;

(C) Not be sold or otherwise transferred to
another customer or electricity user.

(iii) Before providing electricity to a
large-scale industrial power user under this section, the
person shall file a notice with the commission informing
the commission of the agreement to provide electric service
HB0325

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0728
to a large-scale industrial power user and the estimated
amount of electricity to be provided on an annual basis.
The notice required under this paragraph shall be served on
the public utility holding the certificate of convenience
and necessity for the location of the large-scale
industrial power user. The commission shall not charge a
fee or require a hearing, and no decision of the commission
shall be required, before the person providing notice may
proceed with providing electric service to the large-scale
industrial user under this section;

(iv) The person providing electricity to the
large-scale industrial power user may:

(A) Enter into an agreement with a public
utility or other entity to utilize the transmission and
storage infrastructure of the public utility or other
entity. Nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed to
require a public utility or other entity to enter into an
agreement with a person for the use of existing
transmission or storage infrastructure;

HB0325

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0728
(B) Develop and construct its own
transmission or storage infrastructure. The construction of
transmission or storage infrastructure under this
subparagraph shall be subject to this act, except that a
certificate of convenience and necessity under W.S.
37-2-205 and 37-2-205.1 shall not be required for
infrastructure constructed under this subparagraph.

(v) Rates charged by a person providing electric
service to a large-scale industrial power user under this
section and rates charged by a person that develops and
constructs its own transmission or storage infrastructure
under subparagraph (iv)(B) of this subsection shall not be
subject to regulation of rates under this act;

(vi) Rates charged by an electric utility to a
person providing electric service to a large-scale
industrial power user under this section for the use of
transmission lines regulated by the commission shall be
regulated by the commission, provided that the commission
shall establish rates that ensure that other retail
customers not receiving the benefits of electric service
under this section are not disproportionately paying joint
HB0325

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0728
and common costs of electricity transmission to a
large-scale industrial power user;

(vii) Electric service provided by a person to a
large-scale industrial power user under this section shall
not reduce or otherwise adversely affect the service
provided to other customers located in the same
certificated service territory as the large-scale
industrial power user.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
relieve a person providing electric service to a
large-scale industrial power user under this section from
complying with applicable federal laws governing the
generation and transmission of electricity.

Section 2. W.S. 37-2-205(a), (b) and by creating a
new subsection (k), 37-2-205.1 by creating a new subsection
(f), 37-7-101 by creating a new subsection (c) and
37-17-102(b) and by creating new subsections (c) and (d)
are amended to read:

HB0325

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0728
37-2-205. Certificate of convenience and necessity;
hearings.

(a) Except as provided in this subsection and W.S.
37-2-205.2, no public utility shall begin construction or
complete the purchase of a line or plant, or of any
extension of a line or material addition to a plant,
without having first obtained from the commission a
certificate that the present or future public convenience
and necessity require or will require such construction or
purchase. This act shall not be construed to require any
public utility operating outside of a city or town to
secure a certificate for an extension into an area within
which it has lawfully commenced operation, or for an
extension into territory contiguous to its line or plant
for which no certificate is in force and is not served by a
public utility of like character or for any extension
within or to territory already served by it, necessary in
the ordinary course of its business. If any public
utility, in constructing or extending its line or plant
interferes or is about to interfere with the operation of
the line or plant of any other public utility already
authorized or constructed, the commission on complaint of
HB0325

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0728
the public utility claiming to be injuriously affected, may
after hearing make such order and prescribe the terms and
conditions for the location of the lines or plants
affected, as to it are just and reasonable. The power
companies may, without the certificate, increase capacity
of existing plants. For purposes of this subsection,
"material addition" shall not include an addition to a
plant that is necessary to serve load growth, provided that
the capital investment in the addition shall not exceed one
percent (1%) of the total capital investment in the plant
on which return is earned, that is assigned or allocated to
Wyoming customers, based on the public utility's most
recent rate case determination.

(b) Except as provided by W.S. 37-2-205.2, no public
utility shall henceforth exercise any right or privilege or
obtain a franchise or permit to exercise such right or
privilege from a municipality or county, without having
first obtained from the commission a certificate that
public convenience and necessity require the exercise of
such right and privilege; provided, that when the
commission shall find, after hearing, that a public utility
has heretofore begun actual construction work and is
HB0325

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0728
prosecuting such work in good faith, uninterruptedly and
with reasonable diligence in proportion to the magnitude of
the undertaking, under any franchise or permit heretofore
granted but not heretofore actually exercised, such public
utility may proceed to the completion of such work, and
may, after such completion exercise such right or
privilege; and provided, further, that this section shall
not be construed to validate any right or privilege now
invalid or hereafter becoming invalid under any law of this
state, nor impair any vested right in any franchise or
permit heretofore granted.

(k) This section shall not apply to persons defined
in W.S. 37-2-205.2(a)(ii) that provide electric service to
large-scale industrial power users under W.S. 37-2-205.2.

37-2-205.1. Nonsitus certificate of public
convenience and necessity.

(f) This section shall not apply to persons defined
in W.S. 37-2-205.2(a)(ii) that provide electric service to
large-scale industrial power users under W.S. 37-2-205.2.

HB0325

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0728
37-7-101. Formation; petition for organization.

(c) A certificate of necessity specified in
subsection (a) of this section shall not be required for a
power district that provides electric service to
large-scale industrial power users in accordance with W.S.
37-2-205.2.

37-17-102. Retail rate regulation; exemption.

(b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to
alter the certificated service territory of a cooperative
electric utility, except as provided in subsections (c) and
(d) of this section.

(c) Electric service may be provided by a person
defined under W.S. 37-2-205.2(a)(ii) to a large-scale
industrial power user in accordance with W.S. 37-2-205.2
regardless of the certificated service territory of the
cooperative electric utility where the large-scale
industrial power user is located.

HB0325

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0728
(d) A certificate of necessity shall not be required
for a cooperative electric utility that provides electric
service to large-scale industrial power users in accordance
with W.S. 37-2-205.2.

Section 3. The public service commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0325